California statutes. Public Utilities Code
At the hearing, the board of supervisors shall have the power to exclude any unincorporated territory which, in its determination, would not receive reasonable benefit from inclusion in the district. Any landowner within any unincorporated territory proposed for inclusion may by written application request that the board of supervisors consider the exclusion of his property as described in his application from the proposed district. At the conclusion of the hearing the board of supervisors shall determine the boundaries of any unincorporated territory to be included within the proposed district and shall adopt its order calling the election on the question of the
 forming of the proposed district, which election shall be consolidated with the next succeeding primary or general election occurring not sooner than 75 days following the conclusion of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

90075.

The election shall be called, noticed, held, and conducted, election officers appointed, voting precincts designated, ballots printed, polls opened and closed, ballots counted and returned, returns canvassed, results declared, oaths of office administered, and all other proceedings incidental to and connected with the election shall be regulated and done, as nearly as may be practicable, in accordance with the provisions of law regulating municipal elections in general law cities.

For the purposes of the election,
 the terms “board of trustees” and “city clerk,” respectively, as used in the Elections Code provisions respecting the conduct of elections in general law cities, shall mean the county board of supervisors and the registrar of voters, respectively, for the purpose of the election held under this act.

An election called pursuant to the provisions of this act may be consolidated with any other election pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 10 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 203.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

90076.

The count of the votes of the election shall be conducted in two parts (see Section 90050). One part shall consist of the votes cast in the City of San Diego. The second part shall consist of the votes cast in the Cities of Coronado, Imperial Beach, Chula Vista, National City, El Cajon, and La Mesa and outside territory included by the county board of supervisors, if any, at the time of election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

90078.

If from the canvass it appears and the board of supervisors finds that a majority of the votes cast in the City of San Diego and a majority of the votes cast in the other section specified in Section 90050 were cast in favor of the formation of the district, it shall enter that fact upon its minutes together with a description of the boundaries of the district and enter its order declaring the district duly formed and existing in the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Establishment of the District [90100. - 90100.]

90100.

If a majority of the electors voting on the proposition in the City of San Diego and a majority of the electors in the other section specified in Section 90050 vote in favor of the creation and establishment of the district, the board of supervisors shall cause a certified copy of the order declaring the result of the election to be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, from and after which the establishment of the district shall be deemed complete in the City of San Diego and the other section specified in Section 90050.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Contest of Incorporation [90120. - 90120.]

90120.

No informality in any proceeding or in the conduct of the election, not substantially affecting adversely the legal rights of any citizen, shall be held to invalidate the incorporation of the district. Any proceedings wherein the validity of incorporation is denied shall be commenced within three months from the date of filing the order declaring the result of the election with the Secretary of State, otherwise the incorporation and the legal existence of the district shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Internal Organization of District [90170. - 90300.]



  ARTICLE 1. Government [90170. - 90171.]

90170.

The government of the district shall be vested in a board of directors elected concurrent with the district’s formation. If no unincorporated area of the county is included within the district, the City of San Diego shall elect seven directors at large. If any unincorporated area of the county is included within the district, the City of San Diego shall elect eight directors at large. Each of the incorporated cities within the remaining section as specified in Section 90050 and the unincorporated area of the county, if any, shall elect one director. In the event of a tie, the directors involved shall determine by lot which shall be seated.

Whenever any additional member is elected to the board of directors as a result of any annexation to the district, the City of San Diego shall be entitled to seat an additional member on the board of directors. The City Council of the City of San Diego shall appoint any initial additional member to which the city becomes entitled and such member shall serve until a successor is elected at the next succeeding election of directors within the City of San Diego and qualifies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

90171.

The directors elected shall be residents of the respective city they represent at the time of their election and during the term of their office. Any director elected in the unincorporated area shall be a resident of that area at the time of his election and during the term of his office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Terms of Office [90190. - 90194.]

90190.

The term of each director shall be for four years, except as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90191.

Any vacancy, including any caused by death or resignation of any member, shall be filled by appointment of the board of directors within 60 days of date of vacancy. Such appointment shall be made within the jurisdiction in which the vacancy occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90192.

The person to fill any vacancy on the board shall serve temporarily to fill the unexpired term or until a successor is regularly elected at the next election within that jurisdiction whichever occurs first.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90193.

The first members of the board of directors elected after the formation of the district shall so classify themselves by lot that one more than one-half of the directors shall serve for four years, and the remainder of the directors for two years. Thereafter the term of office of each director shall be four years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90194.

Every director is subject to recall by voters of the district, in accordance with the recall provisions of the general laws of the state applicable to county officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Powers and Duties of Directors [90210. - 90219.]

90210.

The oath of office of directors shall be taken, subscribed, and filed with the secretary of the district at any time after the director has been elected, but not later than 15 days after the commencement of his term of office. No other filing is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90211.

The board shall choose one of its members president, and another vice president, who shall be authorized to act for the president during his absence or disability and shall provide for the time and place of holding its meetings, which shall be held at least once each month.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90212.

The board is the legislative body of the district and determines all questions of policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90213.

All matters and things necessary for the proper administration of the affairs of the district which are not provided for in this act shall be provided for by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90214.

The board shall supervise and regulate every transit facility owned and operated by the district, including the fixing of rates, rentals, charges, and classifications, and the making and enforcement of rules, regulations, contracts, practices, and schedules, for or in connection with any transit facility owned or controlled by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90215.

The board may adopt a personnel system for the purpose of recruiting and maintaining an effective working force with good morale. The board shall by resolution determine and create such number and character of positions as are necessary properly to carry on the functions of the district and shall establish an appropriate salary, salary range, or wage for each position so created. The board may by resolution abolish any such position. Except as otherwise provided, appointments to such positions shall be made by the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90216.

The board may from time to time contract for or employ any professional service required by the district or for the performance of work or service which cannot satisfactorily be performed by the regular employees of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90217.

The board shall have an annual audit made of all books and accounts of the district by a certified public accountant or public accountant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90218.

The board may provide by resolution, under such terms and conditions as it sees fit, for the payment of demands against the district without prior specific approval thereof by the board if the demand is for a purpose for which an expenditure has been previously approved by the board and in an amount no greater than the amount so authorized, and if the demand is approved by the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90219.

To facilitate the business of the district, the board may provide for the creation and administration of such funds as the needs of the district may require. The funds shall be disbursed in accordance with rules established by the board and all payments for any fund shall be reported to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Meetings and Legislation [90240. - 90245.]

90240.

All meetings of the board shall be conducted in a manner prescribed by the Ralph M. Brown Act, Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90241.

A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90242.

The board shall establish rules for its proceedings and may provide by ordinance or resolution that each member shall receive for each attendance at the meetings of the board and for each day any member is engaged in authorized district business other than attendance at meetings of the board the sum of fifty dollars ($50) but not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) in any calendar month and shall be allowed such necessary traveling and personal expenses incurred in the performance of his duties as authorized by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90243.

The acts of the board shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance. No ordinance shall be passed by the board on the day of its introduction, nor within seven days thereafter, nor at any time other than a regular or adjourned regular meeting. No ordinance, resolution, or motion shall have any validity or effect unless passed by the affirmative votes of a majority of the directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90244.

All ordinances shall be published after passage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90245.

The enacting clause of all ordinances shall be as follows: “Be it ordained by the Board of Directors of the San Diego County Transit District.” All ordinances shall be signed by the president or vice president of the board and attested by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Other Officers [90260. - 90300.]

90260.

The board shall appoint and fix the salary of a general manager, who shall have full charge of the acquisition, construction, maintenance and operation of the facilities of the district and also of the administration of the business affairs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90261.

All other things being equal, the board shall appoint as general manager some person who has had experience in the construction or management of transit facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90262.

The general manager need not be a resident of this state at the time of his appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90263.

The general manager shall hold office for an indefinite term and may be removed by the board only upon the adoption of a resolution by the affirmative vote of not less than a majority of the board. Before the general manager may be removed, he shall, if he demands it, be given a written statement of the reasons alleged for his removal and he shall have the right to be publicly heard thereon at a meeting of the board prior to the final vote on the resolution providing for his removal, but pending and during such hearing the board may suspend him from office. The board may not reduce the salary of the general manager below the amount fixed at the time of his original
 appointment except upon the adoption of a resolution by a like vote and after a like opportunity to be heard. The action of the board in suspending or removing the general manager or reducing his salary, if approved by a majority of the membership of the board is final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90264.

Notwithstanding this article, until such time as the district has operated, controlled, or used facilities or parts of facilities for providing the inhabitants within the boundaries of the district with transit service for a period of six months, the board may, but is not required to, appoint a general manager. A general manager appointed during such time holds office at the pleasure of the majority of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90265.

The board shall appoint a secretary and an attorney, who shall hold office during the pleasure of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90266.

The attorney shall be admitted to practice law in the Supreme Court of the state, and shall have been actively engaged in the practice of his profession for not less than five years next preceding his appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90267.

The secretary and such assistants as the board may determine, and shall have the power to administer all oaths or affirmations required by this act, including the oath of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90268.

The board may consolidate any of the district offices in one person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90269.

The oath of all appointive officers of the district shall be taken, subscribed, and filed with the secretary of the district at any time after the officer has notice of his appointment but not later than 15 days after the commencement of his term of office. No other filing is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90270.

Each appointive officer shall give such bond and in such amount as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90271.

Subject to the control of the board, the powers and duties of the general manager are:

(a) To have full charge of the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of the facilities of the district.

(b) To have full charge of the administration of the business affairs of the district.

(c) To see that all ordinances of the district are enforced.

(d) To administer the personnel system and collective bargaining
 agreements adopted by the board and except for officers appointed by the board to appoint, discipline or remove all officers and employees subject to the rules and regulations adopted by the board and the applicable provisions of this part or the terms and conditions contained in any applicable collective bargaining agreement.

(e) To attend all meetings of the board and submit a general report of the affairs of the district.

(f) To keep the board advised as to the needs of the district.

(g) To prepare or cause to be prepared all plans and specifications for the construction of the works of the district.

(h) To devote his entire time to the business of the district.

(i) To perform such
 other and additional duties as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90272.

The general manager shall within 90 days from the end of each fiscal year cause to be published a financial report showing the result of the operations for the preceding fiscal year and the financial status of the district on the last day thereof. The publication shall be made in the manner provided in this division for the publication of ordinances and notices generally.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90273.

The attorney shall take charge of all suits and other legal matters to which the district is a party or in which it is legally interested. He shall give his advice or opinion in writing whenever required by the board. He shall be the legal advisor of the general manager and other district officers and shall prepare or approve the forms of all ordinances, resolutions, contracts, bonds, and other legal documents connected with the business of the district. He shall perform such other and additional services as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90274.

The general manager shall provide for the custody of the funds of the district and the keeping of accounts of all receipts and disbursements. Payments shall be made only upon warrants duly and regularly signed by the president or vice president of the board, or other person authorized by the board so to do, and by the general manager or secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90275.

With the consent of the board, the general manager may:

(a) Authorize the trust department of any state or national bank in this state or a trust company authorized to act as such in this state, to receive as his agent deposits of any securities acquired by the district.

(b) Place and maintain for safekeeping as a trust deposit with the trust department of any state or national banks in this state, or a trust company authorized to act as such in this state, any securities owned by the district.

The
 bank or trust company selected shall have a total paid-in capital of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000). The general manager shall take from the trust department or trust company a receipt for the securities, and neither the general manager nor the district is responsible for the custody and safe return of the securities until they are withdrawn from the trust department or trust company by the general manager. Any trust department or trust company to which securities are delivered, either as agent or depository for the general manager, shall make such disposition of the securities as the general manager directs and is responsible only for strict compliance with written instructions given to it by the general manager. All such securities are at all times subject to the order of the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90300.

(a) Employees have the right to self-organize, to form, join, or assist labor organizations, to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing, and to engage in other concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection. It is declared to be in the public interest that the district not express any preference for one union over
 another.

(1) (A) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if a majority of the employees employed by a district in a unit appropriate for collective bargaining indicate a desire to be represented by a labor organization, then the district, after determining pursuant to subdivision (f) that the labor organization represents the employees in the appropriate unit, shall enter into a written contract with the accredited representative of those employees governing wages, salaries, hours, and working conditions.

(B) (i) If a dispute arises over wages, salaries, hours, or working conditions that is not resolved by negotiations conducted in good faith between the district and the labor organization, then upon the request of either party, the district and the labor organization may submit the dispute to an arbitration board. The decision
 of a majority of the arbitration board shall be final.

(ii) The arbitration board shall be composed of two representatives of the district, two representatives of the labor organization, and a fifth member to be agreed upon by the representatives of the district and labor organization.

(iii) If the representatives of the district and labor organization are unable to agree on the fifth member, then the names of five persons experienced in labor arbitration shall be obtained from the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service. The labor organization and the district shall, alternately, strike a name from the list supplied by the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service. The labor organization and the district shall determine by lot who shall first strike a name from the list. After the labor organization and the district have stricken four names, the name
 remaining shall be designated as the arbitrator. The decision of a majority of the arbitration board shall be final and binding upon the parties.

(iv) The expenses of arbitration shall be borne equally by the parties. Each party shall bear the party’s own costs.

(b) If the board and the representatives of the employees do not agree to submit the dispute to an arbitration board as provided in subdivision (a), either party may notify the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service that a dispute exists and that there is no agreement to arbitrate. The California State Mediation and Conciliation Service shall determine whether or not the dispute can be resolved by the parties and, if not, the issues that are the subject of the dispute. After making its determination, the service shall certify its findings to the Governor who shall, within 10 days of receipt of certification,
 appoint a factfinding commission consisting of three persons. The factfinding commission shall immediately convene and investigate the issues involved in the dispute. The commission shall report to the Governor within 30 days of the date of its creation.

(c) After the creation of the commission and for 30 days after the date the commission made its report to the Governor, the parties to the controversy shall not make any change, except by mutual agreement, in the conditions out of which the dispute arose. Service to the public shall be provided during that time.

(d) A contract or agreement shall not be made, or assumed, with any labor organization, association, group, or individual that denies membership to, or in any manner discriminates against, any employee on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections
 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code. However, the organization may preclude from membership any individual who advocates the overthrow of the government by force or violence.

(e) The district shall not discriminate with regard to employment against any person on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(f) (1) Any questions regarding whether a labor organization represents a majority of employees or whether the proposed unit is or is not appropriate, shall be submitted to the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service for disposition. The California State Mediation and Conciliation Service shall promptly hold a public hearing after due notice to all interested
 parties to determine the unit appropriate for the purposes of collective bargaining. In making that determination and in establishing rules and regulations governing petitions and the conduct of hearings and elections, the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service shall be guided by relevant federal law and administrative practice, developed under the Labor-Management Relations Act of 1947 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 141 et seq.).

(2) The California State Mediation and Conciliation Service shall provide for an election to determine the question of representation and shall certify the results to the parties. A certification of a labor organization to represent or act for the employees in any collective bargaining unit shall not be subject to challenge on the grounds that a new substantial question of representation within the collective bargaining unit exists until the lapse of one year from the date of certification or the expiration of any
 collective bargaining agreement, whichever is later. However, no collective bargaining agreement shall be construed to be a bar to representation proceedings for a period of more than two years.

(g) If the district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned public utility, either in proceedings by eminent domain or otherwise, the district shall assume and observe all existing labor contracts.

(1) To the extent necessary for operation of facilities, all of the employees of the acquired public utility whose duties pertain to the facilities acquired shall be appointed to comparable positions in the district without examination, subject to all the rights and benefits of this act. Those employees shall be given sick leave, seniority, vacation, and pension credits in accordance with the records and labor agreements of the acquired public utility.

(2) Members and beneficiaries of any pension or retirement system, or other benefits established by the public utility, shall continue to have the rights, privileges, benefits, obligations, and status with respect to the established system. No employee of any acquired public utility may be subject to a reduction in wages, seniority, pension, vacation, or other benefits as a result of the acquisition.

(3) The district may extend the benefits of this section to officers or supervisory employees of the acquired utility.

(h) The district shall not do any of the following:

(1) Acquire any existing system or part of an existing system, whether by purchase, lease, condemnation, or otherwise.

(2) Dispose of or lease any transit system or part of the transit system.

(3) Merge, consolidate, or coordinate any transit system or part of the transit system.

(4) Reduce or limit the lines or service of any existing system or of the district’s system unless the district has first made adequate provision for any employees who are or may be displaced. The terms and conditions of that provision shall be a proper subject of collective bargaining.

(i) Notwithstanding any provision of the Government Code, the district may make deductions from the wages and salaries of its employees who authorize the deductions for the following purposes:

(1) Pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement with a duly designated or certified labor organization,
 for the payment of union dues, fees, or assessments.

(2) For the payment of contributions pursuant to any health and welfare plan, or pension or retirement plan.

(3) For any purpose for which employees of any private employer may authorize deductions.

(j) (1) The obligation of the district to bargain in good faith with a duly designated or certified labor organization and to execute a written collective bargaining agreement with that labor organization covering the wages, hours, and working conditions of the employees represented by that labor organization in an appropriate unit, and to comply with the terms of the collective bargaining agreement, shall not be limited or restricted by any provision of law. The obligation of the district to bargain collectively shall extend to all subjects of
 collective bargaining that are or may be proper subjects of collective bargaining with a private employer, including retroactive provisions.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the district shall make deductions from the wages and salaries of its employees, upon receipt of authorization to make those deductions, for the payment of union dues, fees, or assessments, for the payment of contributions pursuant to any health and welfare plan or pension plan, or for any other purpose for which employees of any private employer may authorize deductions, where those deductions are pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement with a duly designated or certified labor organization.

(k) The district may provide for a retirement system, provided that the adoption, terms, and conditions of any retirement system covering employees of the district represented by a labor organization
 in accordance with this section shall be pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement between the labor organization and the district.

(l) The district shall take any steps that may be necessary to obtain coverage for the district and its employees under Title II of the Federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 401 et seq.), and the related provisions of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act (26 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.).

(m) The district shall take any steps that may be necessary to obtain coverage for the district and its employees under the workers’ compensation (Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 6100) of the Labor Code), unemployment compensation disability (Part 2 (commencing with Section 2691) of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code), and unemployment insurance (Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) of
 Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code) laws of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 127.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Retirement System [90350. - 90351.]

90350.

The district is empowered to contract with the State Employees’ Retirement System and may provide retirement and disability benefits for employees under the State Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to its rules and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90351.

Whenever the district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned public utility, either in proceedings in eminent domain or otherwise, that has a pension plan in operation, members and beneficiaries of such pension plan shall continue to have the rights, privileges, benefits, obligations and status with respect to such established system.

Whenever any such facilities are acquired by the district, the board shall consider and take into account the outstanding obligations and liabilities of the publicly or privately owned public utility by reason of such pension plan and shall negotiate an allowance in the
 purchase price of such utility for the assumption of such obligations and liabilities when acquiring the facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Powers and Functions of District [90400. - 90570.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Power [90400. - 90402.]

90400.

The district has perpetual succession and may adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90401.

The district may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90402.

The district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted in this act. The district, in exercising such power shall, in addition to the damage for the taking, injury, or destruction of property, also pay the cost of removal, reconstruction, or relocation of any structure, railways, mains, pipes, conduits, cables, or poles of any public utility which is required to be moved to a new location.

No such taking or acquisition by the district which would involve the abandonment, removal, relocation or use of the property of a railroad corporation, as
 defined in Section 230 of this code, shall be permitted, unless the Public Utilities Commission, after hearing, shall find and determine that the public interest and necessity require the abandonment, removal, relocation or use of such property and that such taking or acquisition will not unreasonably impair the ability of the railroad corporation involved to provide safe, adequate, economical and efficient service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1176.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts [90420. - 90421.]

90420.

The district may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, either in connection with eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and save harmless, to employ labor, and to do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90420.5.

The district further shall be empowered to furnish contractual service outside of the district’s boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90421.

Neither the general manager nor any director of the district shall in any manner be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract awarded or to be awarded by the board, or in the profits to be derived therefrom. Any violation of this provision is a misdemeanor, and conviction shall work a forfeiture of office. This section has no application to contracts awarded to corporations in which such officer owns less than 1 percent of the entire capital stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Property [90460. - 90461.]

90460.

The district may take by grant, purchase, gift, devise, or lease, or condemn in proceedings under eminent domain, or otherwise acquire, and hold and enjoy, real and personal property of every kind within or without the district necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers. The board may lease, mortgage, sell, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property within or without the district when in its judgment it is for the best interests of the district so to do.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90461.

Whenever the board by resolution determines that any record, map, book or paper in the possession of the district or any officer or employee thereof is of no further value to the district, the board may authorize its sale, destruction, or other disposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Transit Facilities and Service [90480. - 90490.]

90480.

The district may acquire, construct, own, operate, control or use rights-of-way, rail lines, buslines, stations, platforms, switches, yards, terminals, and any and all such other facilities necessary or convenient for transit service within or partly without the district, underground, upon, or above the ground and under, upon, or over public streets or other public ways or waterways, together with all physical structures necessary or convenient for the access of persons and vehicles thereto, and may acquire any interest in or rights to the joint use of any or all of the foregoing; provided, that installations in state freeways shall be subject to the approval of the State
 Department of Public Works and installations in other state highways shall be subject to Article 2 (commencing with Section 670), Chapter 3, Division 1 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90480.5.

The negotiated purchase price of any existing facilities which are acquired by the district shall not exceed the fair market value of the tangible real and personal property which is acquired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2039.)
-------------------------------------------

90481.
